Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-634
Legal recognition of electronic records, electronic signatures, and electronic contracts.

(1) A record or signature may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because it is in electronic form.

(2) A contract may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because an electronic record was used in its formation.

(3) If a law requires a record to be in writing, an electronic record satisfies the law.

(4) If a law requires a signature, an electronic signature satisfies the law.

Laws 2000, LB 929, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 86-2107;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 396.